Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.210

Order for survey of property—Contents of order—Service.

The order shall describe the property, and a copy thereof shall be served upon the defendant, and thereupon the party may enter upon the property and make such survey and admeasurement; but if any unnecessary injury be done to the premises, he or she shall be liable therefor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 178; Code 1881 s 544; 1877 p 114 s 548; 1869 p 130 s 496; RRS s 802.]